Utah statutes.
48-2e-1152.   Plan of domestication.

(1)  A domestic limited partnership may become a foreign limited partnership in a domestication by approving a plan of domestication.  The plan must be in a record and contain:

(a)  the name of the domesticating limited partnership;

(b)  the name and jurisdiction of formation of the domesticated limited partnership;

(c)  the manner of converting the interests in the domesticating limited partnership into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

(d)  the proposed certificate of limited partnership of the domesticated limited partnership;

(e)  the full text of the partnership agreement of the domesticated limited partnership rights to acquire interests or securities, that are proposed to be in a record;

(f)  the other terms and conditions of the domestication; and

(g)  any other provision required by the law of this state or the partnership agreement of the domesticating limited partnership.

(2)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (1), a plan of domestication may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

